zh-TW: 電子器材 > 船舶電子裝置: 自動識別系統收發器及分隔器; 魚群探測器配件; 魚群探測儀; 航海自動識別系統接收器及收發器; 航海放大器; 船舶用擴大機; 航海自動舵系統; 航海電池及充電器; 航海導航定位裝置; 航海網路及資料介面; 航海電力分配及開關面板; 海洋雷達; 船舶無線電; 航海感測器及監測裝置; 船用喇叭
tr: Elektronik > Deniz Elektronik Sistemleri: AIS Alıcı-Vericiler ve Bölücüler; Balık Bulucu Aksesuarları; Balık Bulucular; Deniz AIS Alıcıları ve Alıcı-vericileri; Deniz Amplifikatörleri; Deniz Ses ve Görüntü Alıcıları; Deniz Otopilotları; Deniz Pilleri ve Şarj Cihazları; Tekne Harita Okuyucu ve GPS Sistemleri; Deniz Ağ ve Veri Arayüzleri; Deniz Güç Dağıtımı ve Anahtar Panelleri; Deniz Radarları; Deniz Telsizleri; Deniz Sensörleri ve İzleme Cihazları; Deniz Hoparlörleri
sv: Elektronik > Marinelektronik: AIS-sändtagare och -delare; Ekolodstillbehör; Fisksökare; Marina AIS-mottagare och -sändtagare; Marina förstärkare; Marinmottagare för ljud och bild; Marina autopiloter; Marina batterier och -laddare; Marina kartplottrar och GPS-enheter; Marina nätverks- och datagränssnitt; Marina elfördelnings- och kopplingspaneler; Marinradar; Marinradio; Marina sensorer och övervakningsenheter; Marinhögtalare
sl-SI: Elektronika > Navtična elektronika: AIS sprejemniki-oddajniki in razdelilniki; Dodatki za iskalnike rib; Iskalniki rib; Morski AIS sprejemniki in sprejemniki-oddajniki; Morski ojačevalniki; Navtični avdio in video sprejemniki; Morski avtopiloti; Morske baterije in polnilniki; Navtični navigacijski sistemi in GPS; Morski omrežni in podatkovni vmesniki; Morske razdelilne in stikalne plošče; Navtični radarji; Navtični radijski sprejemniki; Morski senzorji in nadzorne naprave; Navtični zvočniki
nl: Elektronica > Elektronica voor boten: AIS-transceivers en splitters; Fishfinder accessoires; Viszoekers; Marine ais-ontvangers en transceivers; Marine versterkers; Audio- en video-ontvangers voor boten; Marine autopiloten; Marine-batterijen en laders; Kaartplotters en GPS voor boten; Marine-netwerken en data-interfaces; Marine stroomverdeling en schakelpanelen; Scheepsradar; Scheepsradio's; Marine sensoren en bewakingsapparaten; Luidsprekers voor boten
fi: Elektroniikka > Veneen elektroniikka: AIS-lähetinvastaanotin ja jakaja; Kaikuluotaimen lisävaruste; Kalatutkat; Merenkulun AIS-vastaanotin ja lähetinvastaanotin; Merenkulun vahvistin; Veneen ääni- ja videovastaanottimet; Merenkulun automaattiohjain; Merenkulun akku ja laturi; Veneen karttaplotterit ja GPS; Merenkulun verkkoliitäntä ja datarajapinta; Merenkulun tehonjakelu ja kytkintaulu; Merenkulkututkat; Radiot veneeseen; Merenkulun sensori ja valvontalaite; Kaiuttimet veneeseen
fr: Appareil électronique > Appareils électroniques marins: Émetteurs-récepteurs et séparateurs AIS; Accessoires pour sondeur; Détecteurs de poissons; Récepteurs et émetteurs-récepteurs AIS marins; Amplificateurs marins; Récepteurs audio et vidéo marins; Pilotes automatiques marins; Batteries et chargeurs marins; Traceurs et GPS maritimes; Systèmes de réseau et interfaces de données marins; Distribution d’alimentation et panneaux de commutation marins; Radars de navigation marins; Radios marines; Capteurs et dispositifs de surveillance marins; Haut-parleurs pour bateaux
da: Elektronik > Marineelektronik: AIS-transceivere og fordelere; Ekkolod-tilbehør; Fiskesøgere; AIS-modtagere og -transceivere til skibsbrug; Forstærkere til skibsbrug; AV-modtagere til skibsbrug; Autopiloter til skibsbrug; Batterier og opladere til skibsbrug; Marinediagramplottere og GPS; Netværks- og datainterfaces til skibsbrug; Strømfordeling og omformerpaneler til skibsbrug; Marineradar; Radioer til skibsbrug; Sensorer og overvågningsenheder til skibsbrug; Højttalere til skibsbrug
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 航海电子设备: AIS 收发器和分路器; 鱼探仪配件; 探鱼器; 船用 AIS 接收器和收发器; 船用功放; 航海音频和视频接收器; 船用自动舵; 船用电池和充电器; 海图仪与GPS; 船用网络和数据接口; 船用配电和开关面板; 航海雷达; 航海用无线电; 船用传感器和监控设备; 船用扬声器
cs: Elektronika > Námořní elektronika: AIS vysílače a rozdělovače; Příslušenství rybářských sond; Vyhledávače ryb; Lodní AIS přijímače a vysílače; Lodní zesilovače; Námořní AV technika; Lodní autopiloty; Lodní baterie a nabíječky; Námořní mapové navigace a GPS; Lodní síťové a datové rozhraní; Lodní rozvodné a spínací panely; Námořní radary; Námořní vysílačky; Lodní senzory a monitorovací zařízení; Námořní reproduktory
de: Elektronik > Elektrische Instrumente Seefahrt: AIS-Transceiver und -Splitter; Fischfinder-Zubehör; Fischfinder; Marine-AIS-Empfänger und -Transceiver; Marine-Verstärker; Audio- und Videoemfpänger; Marine-Autopiloten; Marinebatterien und -Ladegeräte; Seekartenplotter & GPS; Marine-Netzwerk- und Datenschnittstellen; Marine-Stromverteilung und -Schaltpaneele; Schiffsradar; Seefunkgeräte; Marine-Sensoren und -Überwachungsgeräte; Marine-Lautsprecher
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Equipamentos eletrônicos de navegação: Transceptores e divisores AIS; Acessórios para localizador de peixes; Fishfinders; Receptores e transceptores AIS marítimos; Amplificadores marítimos; Receptores marinhos de áudio e vídeo; Pilotos automáticos marítimos; Baterias e carregadores marítimos; Chartplotters e GPS marinhos; Rede marítima e interfaces de dados; Distribuição de energia e painéis de controle marítimos; Radar marinho; Rádios marinhos; Sensores e dispositivos de monitoramento marítimos; Alto-falantes marinhos
en: Electronics > Marine Electronics: AIS Transceivers & Splitters; Fish Finder Accessories; Fish Finders; Marine AIS Receivers & Transceivers; Marine Amplifiers; Marine Audio & Video Receivers; Marine Autopilots; Marine Batteries & Chargers; Marine Chartplotters & GPS; Marine Networking & Data Interfaces; Marine Power Distribution & Switch Panels; Marine Radar; Marine Radios; Marine Sensors & Monitoring Devices; Marine Speakers
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị điện hàng hải: Bộ phát nhận và splitter AIS; Phụ kiện máy tìm cá; Máy tầm ngư; Bộ phát nhận AIS hàng hải; Bộ khuếch đại hàng hải; Bộ thu tín hiệu hình ảnh và âm thanh hàng hải; Hệ thống lái tự động; Pin và sạc hàng hải; Thiết bị định vị trên biển và GPS; Mạng hàng hải và giao diện dữ liệu; Bảng phân phối và chuyển mạch điện; Radar hàng hải; Đài phát thanh hàng hải; Cảm biến và thiết bị giám sát hàng hải; Loa hàng hải
hu: Elektronika > Tengeri elektronika: AIS-adóvevők és -elosztók; Halradar-kiegészítők; Halkeresők; Hajózási AIS-vevők és -adóvevők; Hajózási erősítők; Tengeri hang- és videovevők; Hajózási autopilóták; Hajózási akkumulátorok és töltők; Tengeri térképplotterek és GPS; Hajózási hálózati és adatinterfészek; Hajózási áramelosztók és kapcsolópanelek; Tengeri radar; Tengeri rádiók; Hajózási érzékelők és megfigyelő eszközök; Tengeri hangszórók
es: Electrónica > Electrónuca náutica: Transceptores AIS y divisores; Accesorios de buscador de peces; Ecosondas; Receptores y transceptores AIS marinos; Amplificadores marinos; Receptores náuticos de audio y vídeo; Pilotos automáticos marinos; Baterías y cargadores marinos; GPS y trazadores gráficos náuticos; Redes marinas e interfaces de datos; Distribución de energía y paneles de interruptores marinos; Radar náutico; Radios náuticas; Sensores y dispositivos de monitoreo marinos; Altavoces náuticos
lt-LT: Elektronika > Jūrinė elektronika: AIS siųstuvai-imtuvai ir skirstytuvai; Žuvų detektorių priedai; Žuvies ieškikliai; Jūriniai AIS imtuvai ir siųstuvai-imtuvai; Jūriniai stiprintuvai; Jūriniai garso ir vaizdo imtuvai; Jūriniai autopilotai; Jūrinės baterijos ir įkrovikliai; Jūriniai kartploteriai ir GPS; Jūrinio tinklo ir duomenų sąsajos; Jūrinio maitinimo paskirstymo ir jungiklių skydeliai; Jūriniai radarai; Jūriniai radijo imtuvai; Jūriniai jutikliai ir stebėsenos įrenginiai; Jūriniai garsiakalbiai
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Eletrónica marinha: Transcetores e divisores ais; Acessórios de detetor de peixes; Localizadores de peixe; Recetores e transcetores ais marítimos; Amplificadores marítimos; Recetores áudio e vídeo marinhos; Pilotos automáticos marítimos; Baterias e carregadores marítimos; Plotadores de carta marinhos e GPS; Redes e interfaces de dados marítimas; Distribuição de energia e painéis de comutação marítimos; Radar marinho; Rádios marinhos; Sensores e dispositivos de monitorização marítimos; Altifalantes marinhos
ko: 전자기기 > 해상용 전자기기: AIS 송수신기 및 스플리터; 어군 탐지기 액세서리; 어군 탐지기; 해양 AIS 수신기 및 송수신기; 해양 앰프; 해상용 오디오/비디오 수신기; 해양 자동 조타 장치; 해양 배터리 및 충전기; 해양 차트플로터/GPS 장비; 해양 네트워킹 및 데이터 인터페이스; 해양 전력 분배 및 스위치 패널; 해양 레이더; 해상용 무전기; 해양 센서 및 모니터링 장치; 해상용 스피커
ja: 電子機器 > 航海計器: AIS送受信機・スプリッター; 魚群探知機アクセサリー; 魚群探知機; 船舶用AIS受信機・送受信機; 船舶用アンプ; マリンAVレシーバー; 船舶用オートパイロット; 船舶用バッテリーと充電器; GPSプロッター; 船舶用ネットワーク機器・データインターフェース; 船舶用配電盤とスイッチパネル; 船舶レーダー; 船舶無線; 船舶用センサーと監視装置; マリンスピーカー
hr-HR: Elektronika > Brodska elektronika: AIS primopredajnici i razdjelnici; Dodaci za sonar za ribu; Uređaji za pronalazak riba; Brodski AIS prijamnici i primopredajnici; Brodska pojačala; Brodski audio i video prijemnici; Brodski autopiloti; Brodske baterije i punjači; Pomorski određivači puta i GPS; Nautičko umrežavanje i podatkovna sučelja; Brodski distribucijski i prekidački paneli; Pomorski radar; Pomorski radio; Brodski senzori i uređaji za nadzor; Pomorski zvučnici
ru: Электроника > Судовая электроника: Приемопередатчики и разветвители AIS; Аксессуары для эхолотов; Рыбопоисковые эхолоты; Морские приемники и приемопередатчики AIS; Морские усилители; Судовые AV-ресиверы; Морские автопилоты; Морские батареи и зарядные устройства; Картплоттеры и устройства GPS; Морские сетевые и информационные интерфейсы; Морские панели распределения питания и выключателей; Судовые радиолокационные станции; Судовые радиостанции; Морские датчики и устройства мониторинга; Судовые колонки
nb: Elektronikk > Marin elektronikk: AIS-transceivere og splittere; Fiskesonar-tilbehør; Fiskefinnere; Marine AIS-mottakere og -transceivere; Marine forsterkere; Marine lyd- og videomottakere; Marine autopiloter; Marine batterier og ladere; Marine kartplottere og GPS; Marine nettverk og datagrensesnitt; Marine strømfordelings- og bryterpaneler; Marin radar; Marine radioer; Marine sensorer og overvåkingsenheter; Marine høyttalere
it: Elettronica > Dispositivi elettronici nautici: Ricetrasmettitori AIS e splitter; Accessori per ecoscandaglio; Ecoscandagli; Ricevitori e trasmettitori AIS marini; Amplificatori marini; Ricevitori audio e video nautici; Autopiloti marini; Batterie e caricabatterie marini; Chartplotter e GPS nautici; Interfacce di rete e dati marini; Pannelli di distribuzione dell'alimentazione e pannelli di commutazione marini; Radar nautico; Radio marine; Sensori marini e dispositivi di monitoraggio; Altoparlanti nautici
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ทางทะเล: เครื่องส่งรับและตัวแยกสัญญาณ AIS; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องหาปลา; เครื่องค้นหาปลา; เครื่องรับและส่งรับสัญญาณ AIS เรือ; แอมป์เรือ; เอวีรีซีฟเวอร์ในเรือ; เครื่องบังคับอัตโนมัติเรือ; แบตเตอรี่และเครื่องชาร์จเรือ; เครื่องพล็อทชาร์ทและ GPS; อุปกรณ์เครือข่ายและอินเทอร์เฟซข้อมูลเรือ; แผงจ่ายไฟและสวิตช์เรือ; เรดาร์ทางทะเล; วิทยุเรือ; เซ็นเซอร์และอุปกรณ์ตรวจสอบเรือ; ลำโพงสำหรับใช้ในทะเล
pl: Elektronika > Elektronika morska: Nadajniki i rozdzielacze AIS; Akcesoria do echosond; Sonary do lokalizacji ryb; Odbiorniki i nadajniki AIS morskie; Wzmacniacze morskie; Morskie odbiorniki obrazu i dźwięku; Autopiloty morskie; Baterie i ładowarki morskie; Chartplottery i GPS-y morskie; Sieci morskie i interfejsy danych; Panele dystrybucji energii i przełączników morskich; Radary morskie; Radia morskie; Czujniki i urządzenia monitorujące morskie; Głośniki morskie
ro-RO: Electronice > Dispozitive electronice maritime: Aparate de emisie-recepție și splittere AIS; Accesorii pentru sonar de pescuit; Dispozitive de căutare pești; Receptoare și aparate de emisie-recepție AIS pentru navigație; Amplificatoare pentru navigație; Receptoare maritime audio și video; Autopiloți marini; Baterii și încărcătoare marine; Plotere și GPS maritime; Rețelistică marină și interfețe de date; Distribuție de putere și panouri de comutare marine; Radar maritim; Radiouri maritime; Senzori și dispozitive de monitorizare marine; Difuzoare maritime
sk-SK: Elektronika > Námorné elektronické zariadenia: AIS transceivery a splittery; Príslušenstvo sonarov; Sonary na ryby; Námorné AIS prijímače a transceivery; Námorné zosilňovače; Námorné audio a video prijímače; Námorné autopiloty; Námorné batérie a nabíjačky; Lodné navigačné a GPS vybavenie; Námorné sieťové a dátové rozhrania; Námorné rozvádzače a spínacie panely; Námorný radar; Námorné rádiá; Námorné senzory a monitorovacie zariadenia; Námorné reproduktory
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ναυτικά ηλεκτρονικά είδη: Πομποδέκτες & διαχωριστές AIS; Αξεσουάρ ιχνηθέτη ψαριών; Συσκευές ανίχνευσης ψαριών; Δέκτες & πομποδέκτες AIS θαλάσσης; Ενισχυτές θαλάσσης; Θαλάσσιοι δέκτες ήχου & βίντεο; Αυτόματοι πιλότοι θαλάσσης; Μπαταρίες & φορτιστές θαλάσσης; Συστήματα πλοήγησης & GPS για σκάφη; Δικτύωση & διεπαφές δεδομένων θαλάσσης; Διανομή ισχύος & πίνακες διακοπτών θαλάσσης; Ναυτιλιακό Ραντάρ; Συσκευές ναυτικής ραδιοεπικοινωνίας; Αισθητήρες & συσκευές παρακολούθησης θαλάσσης; Θαλάσσια ηχεία
bg-BG: Електроника > Морска електроника: AIS приемно-опредаватели и сплитери; Аксесоари за ехолот; Търсачи на риба; Морски AIS приемници и приемопредаватели; Морски усилватели; Морски аудио- и видеоприемници; Морски автопилоти; Морски батерии и зарядни устройства; Морски картографи и GPS; Морско мрежово оборудване и интерфейси за данни; Морско разпределение на захранване и панели за превключватели; Морски радар; Морски радиостанции; Морски сензори и устройства за наблюдение; Морски високоговорители